Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Board of Certified Court Reporters

§ 9-13-101.
Board of Certified Court Reporters; membership; terms of office.

The Board of Certified Court Reporters, hereinafter referred to as “the board,” shall be composed of nine (9) members. Two (2) of the members shall be judges, one (1) from the Supreme Court and one (1) from a trial court, appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Mississippi with the approval of the full court. Two (2) of the board members shall be practicing attorneys and shall be appointed by the Chief Justice, with the approval of the full court, on nomination by the Mississippi Bar. Two (2) of the members shall be official court reporters in, and citizens of, Mississippi for at least five (5) years prior to their appointments and shall be appointed by the Chief Justice with approval of the full court on nomination by the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Court Reporters Association. Two (2) of the members shall be free-lance court reporters in, and citizens of, Mississippi for at least five (5) years prior to their appointments and shall be appointed by the Chief Justice with approval of the full court on nomination by the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Court Reporters Association. Initially, for judges, lawyers and reporters, one (1) of the two (2) shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year and one (1) for a term of two (2) years. For court reporters, one (1) official shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year and one (1) for a term of two (2) years and one (1) free-lance court reporter shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year and one (1) for a term of two (2) years. The ninth board member shall be the Supreme Court Clerk, who shall serve as a permanent member of the board.

After each member’s term expires, his successor shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years. The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall fill any vacancy for the duration of an unexpired term by appointing a person having the appropriate qualifications and the Supreme Court may remove any member for cause. Members may be appointed to successive terms.

Each member shall take an oath that he will fairly, impartially and to the best of his ability administer the provisions of Sections 9-13-101 through 9-13-121.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 10, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 9-13-103.
Meetings of board; officers; mailing address.

The Supreme Court shall specify a date for the first meeting of the board, at which the board will organize itself by electing one (1) of its members chairman and electing such other officers as deemed appropriate. The office of the Supreme Court shall be the permanent mailing address for all applications or correspondence of the board. The board shall hold its meetings not less than once a year at such times and places as the board shall designate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 11, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 9-13-105.
Duties and powers of board.

The board is charged with the duty and vested with the power and authority:

To determine the content of and administer examinations to be given to applicants for certification as a court reporter.

To determine an applicant’s ability to make a verbatim record of proceedings which may be used in any court in this state by any recognized system designated by the board and to pass upon the eligibility of applicants for certification.

To issue certificates to those found qualified as court reporters who are in compliance with Section 9-13-109.

To promulgate, amend and revise regulations relevant to its duties as necessary to implement this chapter. Such regulations shall be consistent with the provisions of Sections 9-13-101 through 9-13-121 and shall not be effective until approved by the Supreme Court.

To make studies and, from time to time, recommendations to the Supreme Court concerning matters pertaining to court reporters.

To account to the Supreme Court in all fiscal matters following recognized accounting procedures of the State Auditor.

To exercise jurisdiction over disciplinary matters with regard to certified court reporters, those reporters granted temporary permission as noncertified or nonresident court reporters, those holding themselves out in the State of Mississippi to be court reporters and anyone engaged in the unauthorized practice of court reporting within the State of Mississippi in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board.

To enter into contracts, hire staff and do such other things as may be necessary to implement the provisions of Sections 9-13-101 through 9-13-121.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 12; Laws, 2011, ch. 311, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 9-13-107.
Certification of reporters required; application for certification examination.

No person shall be qualified or authorized to report testimony or proceedings relevant to matters under the jurisdiction of the courts of the State of Mississippi, all state agencies or the Legislature or any committee or subcommittee thereof, or where appeal to any court of the State of Mississippi is allowable by law, unless such person satisfies the provisions of Sections 9-13-101 through 9-13-121 with respect to certification. Sections 9-13-101 through 9-13-121 shall not be construed to apply to any proceedings that take place outside the borders of the State of Mississippi.

Every applicant for examination for certification as a Certified Shorthand Reporter shall file with the person designated by the board a written application in the form prescribed by the board. At the time the application is filed, the applicant shall pay to the board an application fee established by regulation, which fee shall not be subject to withdrawal by the applicant in the event he should decide not to take the examination or is denied the right to take the examination. Upon request, the board shall forward to any interested person application forms together with the text of this chapter and copies of regulations promulgated by the board under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 13, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 9-13-109.
Requirements for certification.

Every applicant for certification shall have reached the age of majority, be of good moral character and be a resident citizen of the State of Mississippi. Further, every applicant shall meet the criteria established by the board for certification or shall meet the requirements of Section 9-13-109.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 14, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 9-13-111.
Issuance of certification without examination; requirements.

Upon application and payment of the application fee within six (6) months of July 2, 1994, and upon a showing of residence within the State of Mississippi, certification without examination shall issue to:

Any official court reporter serving on January 3, 1996, in a Mississippi court on a full-time basis, if such reporter is actually engaged in verbatim reporting through shorthand symbols or the stenomask method.

Any free-lance reporter actually engaged in verbatim reporting through shorthand symbols or the stenomask method and who had been so engaged as of July 2, 1994.

Any person enrolled in any public or private institution in the State of Mississippi on July 2, 1994, who is majoring in a course of study in court reporting and who receives a degree in such course of study.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 15; Laws, 1996, ch. 484, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996).

§ 9-13-113.
Official court reporters must be certified shorthand reporters; exception for temporary reporters.

After July 2, 1994, no judge of any court of this state shall appoint an official court reporter who is not a certified shorthand reporter. In the event of a vacancy, a judge may appoint a temporary reporter; but such temporary reporter shall, within thirty (30) days of such appointment, make application for temporary certification and shall not serve for more than six (6) months without having obtained a permanent certification under Sections 9-13-101 through 9-13-121, except as provided by Section 9-13-121(3).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 16, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 9-13-115.
Free-lance and nonresident reporters.

Free-lance reporters shall make application for certification in the manner prescribed in Section 9-13-105. Without satisfying the requirements of this chapter, no free-lance reporter shall make a verbatim record of any testimony of a proceeding, jurisdiction of which is within the courts of Mississippi or where appeal to any court of the State of Mississippi is allowable by law.

Any court reporter not a resident of Mississippi wishing to make a verbatim record or transcript of testimony to be used in a legal proceeding within the State of Mississippi may do so upon obtaining temporary permission from the board or the judge of any court of record, such permission not to be valid for more than thirty (30) days unless special conditions are established therein by the board or judge from whom the temporary permission was obtained.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 17, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 9-13-117.
Revocation or suspension of certificate; disqualification.

The board, for good cause shown and in keeping with its regulations and after a hearing conducted in a manner consistent with due process, may revoke or suspend any certificate issued or may disqualify any applicant from certification.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 18, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 9-13-118.
Practicing court reporting without certification; filing false information to obtain certification; penalties.

Any person who: (a) undertakes or attempts to undertake the practice of court reporting for remuneration without having first procured a certificate or temporary permission under Sections 9-13-101 through 9-13-123; or (b) knowingly files false information with the board for the purpose of obtaining certification or temporary permission under Sections 9-13-101 through 9-13-123, shall be subject to a civil fine to be imposed by the board of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

Each day’s violation shall be considered a separate infraction.

A person who is not authorized to practice court reporting under Sections 9-13-101 through 9-13-123 shall not bring or maintain an action to recover fees for court reporting services that the person performed in violation of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 311, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 9-13-119.
Annual certification fee; renewal of certification; disposition of funds.

All Certified Shorthand Reporters and Certified Stenomask Reporters shall pay to the board an annual certification fee established by the board. All certificates issued under the provisions of this chapter shall expire one (1) year from the date of issue. Applications for renewal of certification shall be accompanied by the required annual certification fee.

All funds collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into a special fund, hereby created in the State Treasury. All expenses incurred by the board in implementing the provisions of this chapter shall be paid out of such special fund pursuant to legislative appropriation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 19, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 9-13-121.
Giving of examinations for certification; notice; effect of not passing examination; temporary certificates; photo identification.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), any person graduating from a court reporting school approved by the State of Mississippi or some other state shall be given a temporary certification but shall make application for and pass a Certified Shorthand Reporter’s (CSR) examination as is provided in this section.

Any person who is enrolled in a court reporting program or court reporting school, whether in Mississippi or out of state, that is accredited by the National Court Reporting Association, and who graduates prior to November 1, 2008, shall be granted certification without examination.

The Board of Court Reporters shall implement a true CSR examination wherein all examinees are given the option to take any part or parts of the examination independent of the other parts; however, each part, once passed, need not be retaken by that examinee. Any applicant granted a temporary certification or permit shall be allowed not less than thirty-six (36) months after being granted the temporary certification or permit to pass the examination.

Examinations for certification shall be given not less than every six (6) months at a time and place designated by the board. Notification of such examinations shall be given each applicant in writing not less than thirty (30) days before each examination date. Proof of notice of an examination having been sent less than thirty (30) days before an examination date shall automatically extend a temporary certificate for an additional six (6) months beyond what is otherwise provided in this section.

If an applicant holding temporary certification has not qualified for certification within the required time, the applicant shall be permitted a hearing before the board. If said applicant has passed at least two (2) parts of the examination, the applicant will be given an additional extension of not more than one (1) year.

If a court reporter is unavailable, the use of audio or video equipment shall be authorized.

Those reporters holding temporary certificates must submit their applications, together with the fee, to the board and take the next scheduled examination. If the applicant holding temporary certification has not qualified for certification within the required time, the applicant shall be deemed unqualified to serve as a reporter until the applicant passes the examination and receives permanent certification or has been granted an extension according to subsection (2).

Photo identification may be required of any applicant prior to the taking of an examination for security reasons only but shall not be used for discrimination against applicants on the basis of race, gender, age, creed or national origin.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 20; Laws, 2000, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 479, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 10, 2003).

§ 9-13-123.
Definitions; effect of chapter on courts and individual’s rights.

As used in Sections 9-13-101 through 9-13-121:

“Courts” includes all courts. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as a limitation upon the power of the Supreme Court or of the trial courts to govern the conduct of, and to discipline, official court reporters, nor shall this chapter be construed as any limitation upon the rights of any individual to seek any remedy afforded by law, nor as any exclusive mode of regulating court reporters.

“Court reporter” means a Certified Shorthand Reporter or a Certified Stenomask Reporter.

“The practice of court reporting” means the making of a verbatim record by means of written symbols or abbreviations in pen shorthand, machine shorthand, or oral stenography, also known as steno mask, of testimony or proceedings relevant to matters under the jurisdiction of the courts of the State of Mississippi, all state agencies or the Legislature or any committee or subcommittee thereof, or where appeal to any court of the State of Mississippi is allowable by law.

“The making of a verbatim record” includes the taking of a deposition.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 599, § 21; Laws, 2011, ch. 311, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2011.